Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,202
Actions against state; complaint; contents.

The claimant shall, in all cases, file a complaint setting forth (1) the facts out of which the claim originally arose; (2) the action of the Legislature, or of any department of the government thereon, if any such has been had; (3) what person or persons is the owner or are the owners thereof, or in anywise interested therein; (4) that no assignment or transfer of the same, or any part thereof, or interest therein, has been made, except as stated in the complaint; and (5) that the claimant is justly entitled to the amount claimed therein from the state after allowance of all just credits and setoffs.

Laws 1877, § 2, p. 20;

R.S.1913, § 1178;

C.S.1922, § 1101;

C.S.1929, § 27-320;

R.S.1943, § 24-320;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-320;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 50.